trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oguemos</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oguemos</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogué</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oguéis</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oguémo</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oguémos</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogá</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantá" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogábamos</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogád</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantád" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogáis</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogándo</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogár</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantár" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogáramos</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ogó</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>uéga</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cánta" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>uégue</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>uéguen</l>
        <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="horas">
      <e>
    <re>[0-2]?[0-9]h[0-6][0-9]</re>
    <p>
      <l/>
      <r><s n="num"/><s n="hour"/></r>
    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

      <e><par n="horas"/></e>
